Washington statutes.
RCW 35.07.220

Receiver—Final account and discharge.

Upon the final payment of all lawful demands against the former city or town, the receiver shall file a final account, together with all vouchers, with the clerk of the superior court. Any funds remaining in his or her hands shall be paid to the county treasurer for the use of the school district in which the former city or town was situated; and thereupon the receivership shall be at an end.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2009; 1965 c 7 s 35.07.220. Prior: 1897 c 69 s 14; RRS s 8927.]